District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1101

Taxes and assessments — Annual statement to owner; installment payments; interest.

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1933, 47 Stat. 1347, ch. 130, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 504(d), 48 DCR 334
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 2002(i), 48 DCR 6981
1981 Ed., § 47-1101.
1973 Ed., § 47-901.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4(e) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2(i) of Real Property Tax Assessment Transition Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-23, September 6, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9093).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(d) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(i) of Real Property Tax Assessment Transition Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-44, April 18, 2001, 48 DCR 3844).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(i) of Real Property Tax Assessment Transition Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-116, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7659).
Office of Assessor abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-413.